Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.395

Form and contents of filings.

The form and contents of any filing made under this chapter need conform only to the applicable requirements and forms prescribed by the director then in effect, and contain the information, including financial statements, required at the time the filing is made, notwithstanding subsequent changes, except as otherwise provided in any such amendment or in RCW 32.32.400.

[ 1994 c 92 s 389; 1981 c 85 s 78.]